Washington statutes.
RCW 13.64.080

Forms to initiate petition of emancipation.

The administrative office of the courts shall prepare and distribute to the county court clerks appropriate forms for minors seeking to initiate a petition of emancipation.

[ 2005 c 282 s 28; 1993 c 294 s 8.]